Massachusetts, session 194th, H3774.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Mass General Laws Chapter 159B is amended by adding the
following definitions:
"Covered establishment", a restaurant or other eating or drinking establishment offering
same-day food or drink for sale in a single commercial transaction through any third-party
delivery service platform.
"Customer", an individual using a third-party delivery service platform to place an online
order.
“Delivery -assessments”, the fee paid by the customer to the third party delivery service
company.
''Department'', the department of public utilities.
of 3

"Online order", an order for food or drinks placed by a customer through a third-party
delivery service platform provided by a third-party delivery service company for pickup or
delivery in the commonwealth.
"Purchase price", the menu price publicly offered on the third-party delivery service
platform by a covered establishment. The purchase price shall not include any taxes, gratuities or
other fees that may make up the total cost charged to the customer for an online order.
"Third-party delivery service company", a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship or
other entity qualified to do business in the commonwealth that is engaged in facilitating same-
day delivery or pickup of food and beverages through a third-party delivery service platform for
20 or more separately owned and operated covered establishments.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 159B is hereby further amended by adding the following
section:-
SECTION 23. (a)Annually, not later than February 1, each third-party delivery service
company shall submit to the director of the number of deliveries from the previous calendar year
that originated in each city or town and the amount collected from delivery-assessments.
Notwithstanding any other law, a delivery assessment of no less than $.50 per order shall be
applied to orders. The delivery assessment shall not apply to items that are not subject to state
sales tax.
(b) The department shall have the ability to adjust the delivery assessment no less than
every two years based on inflation.
of 3

(b) The division shall: (i) proportionately distribute ½ of the amount received from the
fund to a city or town based on the number of rides from the previous calendar year that
originated within that city or town to address the impact of transportation network services on
municipal roads, bridges and other transportation infrastructure or any other public purpose
substantially related to the operation of transportation network services in the city or town
including, but not limited to, the complete streets program established in section 1 of chapter 90I
of the General Laws and other programs that support alternative modes of transportation;
provided that, if the amount of the distribution to a city or town is $25,000 or less, the chief
executive officer as defined in section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws, may expend such
funds for these purposes without further appropriation; and (ii) distribute 1/2 of the amount
collected to the Commonwealth Transportation Fund established in section 2ZZZ of chapter 29
of the General Laws.
of 3